csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_Cnj_VV.yaml
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: nibaasiiwaanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: nibaasiiwegwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: nibaasiiwanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: nibaasiinigwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: nibaasiiwaagwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: nibaasiinigwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: nibaasiigwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: nibaasiiwaangen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: nibaasiiwangen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+NA: nibaasiiwiingen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: webinigesiiwaanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: webinigesiiwegwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: webinigesiiwanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: webinigesiinigwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: webinigesiiwaagwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: webinigesiinigwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: webinigesiigwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: webinigesiiwaangen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: webinigesiiwangen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+NA: webinigesiiwiingen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: madaabiisiiwaanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: madaabiisiiwegwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: madaabiisiiwanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: madaabiisiinigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: madaabiisiiwaagwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: madaabiisiinigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: madaabiisiigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: madaabiisiiwaangen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: madaabiisiiwangen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+NA: madaabiisiiwiingen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: maajiibatoosiiwaanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: maajiibatoosiiwegwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: maajiibatoosiiwanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: maajiibatoosiinigwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoosiiwaagwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoosiinigwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoosiigwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: maajiibatoosiiwaangen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: maajiibatoosiiwangen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+NA: maajiibatoosiiwiingen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: nibaawaanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: nibaawegwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: nibaawanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: nibaanigwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: nibaawaagwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: nibaanigwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: nibaagwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: nibaawaangen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: nibaawangen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+NA: nibaawiingen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: webinigewaanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: webinigewegwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: webinigewanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: webinigenigwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: webinigewaagwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: webinigenigwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: webinigegwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: webinigewaangen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: webinigewangen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+NA: webinigewiingen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: madaabiiwaanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: madaabiiwegwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: madaabiiwanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: madaabiinigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: madaabiiwaagwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: madaabiinigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: madaabiigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: madaabiiwaangen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: madaabiiwangen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+NA: madaabiiwiingen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: maajiibatoowaanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: maajiibatoowegwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: maajiibatoowanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: maajiibatoonigwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoowaagwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoonigwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoogwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: maajiibatoowaangen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: maajiibatoowangen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+NA: maajiibatoowiingen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: nibaasiiwaambaanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: nibaasiiwegibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: nibaasiiwambanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: nibaasiinigobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: nibaasiiwaagobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: nibaasiinigobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: nibaasiigobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: nibaasiiwaangibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: nibaasiiwangibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: nibaasiiwiingibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: webinigesiiwaambaanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: webinigesiiwegibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: webinigesiiwambanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: webinigesiinigobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: webinigesiiwaagobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: webinigesiinigobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: webinigesiigobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: webinigesiiwaangibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: webinigesiiwangibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: webinigesiiwiingibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: madaabiisiiwaambaanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: madaabiisiiwegibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: madaabiisiiwambanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: madaabiisiinigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: madaabiisiiwaagobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: madaabiisiinigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: madaabiisiigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: madaabiisiiwaangibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: madaabiisiiwangibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: madaabiisiiwiingibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: maajiibatoosiiwaambaanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: maajiibatoosiiwegibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: maajiibatoosiiwambanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: maajiibatoosiinigobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoosiiwaagobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoosiinigobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoosiigobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: maajiibatoosiiwaangibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: maajiibatoosiiwangibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: maajiibatoosiiwiingibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: nibaawaambaanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: nibaawegibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: nibaawambanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: nibaanigobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: nibaawaagobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: nibaanigobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: nibaagobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: nibaawaangibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: nibaawangibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: nibaawiingibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: webinigewaambaanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: webinigewegibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: webinigewambanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: webinigenigobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: webinigewaagobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: webinigenigobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: webinigegobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: webinigewaangibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: webinigewangibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: webinigewiingibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: madaabiiwaambaanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: madaabiiwegibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: madaabiiwambanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: madaabiinigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: madaabiiwaagobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: madaabiinigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: madaabiigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: madaabiiwaangibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: madaabiiwangibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: madaabiiwiingibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: maajiibatoowaambaanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: maajiibatoowegibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: maajiibatoowambanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: maajiibatoonigobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoowaagobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoonigobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoogobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: maajiibatoowaangibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: maajiibatoowangibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: maajiibatoowiingibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: nibaasiwaan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: nibaasiweg
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: nibaasiwan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: nibaasinig
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: nibaasigwaa
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: nibaasinig
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: nibaasig
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: nibaasiwaang
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: nibaasiwang
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+NA: nibaasing
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: webinigesiwaan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: webinigesiweg
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: webinigesiwan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: webinigesinig
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: webinigesigwaa
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: webinigesinig
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: webinigesig
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: webinigesiwaang
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: webinigesiwang
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+NA: webinigesing
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: madaabiisiwaan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: madaabiisiweg
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: madaabiisiwan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: madaabiisinig
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: madaabiisigwaa
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: madaabiisinig
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: madaabiisig
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: madaabiisiwaang
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: madaabiisiwang
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+NA: madaabiising
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: maajiibatoosiwaan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: maajiibatoosiweg
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: maajiibatoosiwan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: maajiibatoosinig
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoosigwaa
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoosinig
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoosig
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: maajiibatoosiwaang
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: maajiibatoosiwang
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+NA: maajiibatoosing
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: nibaayaan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: nibaayeg
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: nibaayan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: nibaanid
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: nibaawaad
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: nibaanid
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: nibaad
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: nibaayaang
